Illinois, session 104th, HB5362.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for the purpose of 7providing a grant for to Afterschool for Children and Teens 8Now (ACT Now) Coalition to support full-service community 9schools. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.